Hawaii statutes.
§302A-807 Refusal, suspension, revocation,
and reinstatement of licenses. (a) The board shall serve as the final
adjudicator for appeals relating to licensing, including the issuance or
nonissuance of licenses, and the condition, suspension, nonrenewal, and
revocation of licenses.

(b) The board shall establish procedures for
the conduct of proceedings for the consideration of requests filed with the
board. In every case to condition, revoke, or suspend a license, the board
shall give the person concerned written notice that a request has been filed
with the board. The board shall conduct a hearing in conformity with chapter
91, and shall provide for confidentiality of the proceedings to protect the
parties. In all proceedings before it, the board may administer oaths, compel
the attendance of witnesses and production of documentary evidence, and examine
witnesses. In case of disobedience by any person to any order of the board or
to any subpoena issued by the board, or the refusal of any witness to testify
to any matter that the person may be questioned lawfully, any circuit judge, on
application of the board or a member thereof, shall compel obedience in the
case of disobedience of the requirements of a subpoena issued by a circuit
court or a refusal to testify.

(c) Any applicant who has been refused a
license, or any licensee whose license has been conditioned, suspended, or
revoked, shall have the right to appeal the board's decision to the circuit
court of the circuit in which the applicant or licensee resides in the manner
provided in chapter 91; provided that out-of-state resident applicants
shall file their appeals in the first circuit court.

(d) Upon revocation of a license, the board
may disclose the name, birthdate, social security number, and any other
pertinent information about the former holder of the license:

(1) To the department;

(2) To the commission; and

(3) For the purpose of exchanging information under
chapter 315 with other national or state teacher certification agencies about
school personnel who have had licenses revoked.

(e) The board shall not renew or reinstate, or
shall deny or suspend any license or application, if the board has received
certification from an administering entity pursuant to chapter 436C that the licensee
or applicant is in default or breach of any obligation under any student loan,
student loan repayment contract, or scholarship contract that financed the
licensee's or applicant's education, or has failed to comply with a repayment
plan.

The board in receipt of a certification
pursuant to chapter 436C shall, as applicable, and without further review or
hearing:

(1) Suspend the license;

(2) Deny the application or request for renewal of
the license; or

(3) Deny the request for reinstatement of the
license,

and unless otherwise provided by law, shall renew,
reinstate, or grant the license only upon receipt of an authorization from the
administering entity. [L 1996, c 89, pt of §2; am L 2001, c 312, pt of §10 and
§13; am L 2002, c 16, §20 and c 226, §4; am L 2003, c 3, §12 and c 133, §5; am
L 2011, c 134, §4; am L 2014, c 39, §8]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next